Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 5. MATTERS AFFECTING PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

SUBTITLE B. COUNTY OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

CHAPTER 154. COMPENSATION OF DISTRICT, COUNTY, AND PRECINCT OFFICERS ON SALARY BASIS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 154.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "precinct officer" means a justice of the peace or a constable.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 154.002. SALARY PAID IN LIEU OF FEES AND COMMISSIONS. A district, county, or precinct officer who is paid on a salary basis receives the salary instead of all fees, commissions, and other compensation the officer would otherwise be authorized to keep, except as otherwise provided by this subchapter.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 154.003. COLLECTION AND DISPOSITION OF FEES AND COMMISSIONS OF SALARIED OFFICER. A district, county, or precinct officer who is paid an annual salary shall charge and collect in the manner authorized by law all fees, commissions, and other compensation permitted for official services performed by the officer. The officer shall dispose of the collected money as provided by Subchapter B, Chapter 113.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 154.004. STATE AND COUNTY PROHIBITED FROM PAYING FEES OR COMMISSIONS TO SALARIED OFFICER. (a) The state may not pay a district officer a fee or commission for the performance of a service by the officer.

(b) If a county officer is paid an annual salary, the state or any county may not pay a fee or commission to the officer for the performance of a service by the officer.

(c) The state or any county may not pay a fee or commission to a precinct officer for the performance of a service by the officer.

(d) The prohibitions established by this section do not affect:

(1) fees and commissions the county tax assessor-collector is authorized by law to collect;

(2) the payment of costs in a civil case or eminent domain proceeding by the state; or

(3) the payment of fees and commissions by the state or a county for services performed by county officers relating to the acquisition of rights-of-way for public roads and highways.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 154.005. FEES AND COMMISSIONS CERTAIN SALARIED OFFICERS MAY RECEIVE IN ADDITION TO SALARY. (a) A justice of the peace may receive, in addition to a salary, all fees, commissions, or payments for performing marriage ceremonies, for acting as registrar for the Bureau of Vital Statistics, and for acting as ex officio notary public.

(b) A county judge may receive, in addition to a salary, all fees, commissions, or payments for performing marriage ceremonies.

(c) A sheriff or constable may receive, in addition to a salary, any reward for the apprehension of a criminal fugitive from justice or for the recovery of stolen property.

(d) A constable may receive, in addition to Subsection (c), all fees, commissions, or payments for delivering notices required by Section 24.005, Property Code, relating to eviction actions. Notices may only be delivered when not in conflict with the official duties and responsibilities of the constable. A constable delivering said notices must not be wearing upon his or her person a uniform or any insignia which would usually be associated with the position of constable nor may the constable use a county vehicle or county equipment while delivering said notices. For purposes of collecting fees for serving said notices, a constable is considered a private process server.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 884, Sec. 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1998.

Sec. 154.006. INSUFFICIENT SALARY FUND SUPPLEMENTED BY TRANSFER FROM GENERAL FUND. If a salary fund created under this chapter does not contain enough money to pay the claims against it, the commissioners court shall transfer to the salary fund from the general fund of the county an amount of money necessary to pay those claims.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 154.007. USE OF GENERAL FUND INSTEAD OF SALARY FUND. (a) At its first regular meeting in the first month of each fiscal year, the commissioners court may direct, by order entered in its minutes, that all money that otherwise would be deposited in a salary fund created under this chapter shall be deposited in the general fund of the county.

(b) In a county in which the order is adopted, a reference in this chapter to a salary fund means the general fund.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 154.008. LEGISLATIVE APPROPRIATION FOR OFFICERS COMPENSATED ON SALARY BASIS. (a) The comptroller of public accounts shall apportion and pay to counties in which county officers are compensated on a salary basis the money the legislature appropriates for the year for that purpose.

(b) The comptroller shall apportion the money on the basis of population. The annual apportionment may not exceed 14 cents a person, except that in a county that had a population of less than 60,000 according to the 1930 federal census and in which the ad valorem valuation for all purposes according to the most recently approved tax roll exceeds the valuation for 1930 by 50 percent or more, the annual apportionment may not exceed 25 cents a person.

(c) The comptroller shall make the payment each year in four installments on the first day of January, April, July, and October. However, if a commissioners court orders that county officers who were previously compensated by fees are to be compensated by salary, the comptroller shall pay the first installment to that county within 15 days after the date the comptroller receives notice of the commissioners court's order.

(d) The comptroller shall mail or electronically transmit a warrant for the payment to the county treasurer. The warrant must be:

(1) drawn on the state treasury;

(2) payable to the county treasurer; and

(3) registered by the comptroller.

(e) The payment shall be deposited in the salary fund of the county. If a county has more than one salary fund, the commissioners court shall apportion the payment among the salary funds.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1423, Sec. 13.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 934 (H.B. 3439), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 154.009. EFFECT OF FAILURE TO COLLECT FEE OR COMMISSION. (a) If, following a hearing, the commissioners court finds that a district, county, or precinct officer has, through neglect, failed to collect a fee or commission that the officer is required by law to collect, the commissioners court shall deduct the amount of the fee or commission from the officer's salary. Before the 10th day before the date of the hearing, the commissioners court shall provide the officer with notice of the time and place of the hearing and an itemized statement of the uncollected fees to be charged against the officer's salary.

(b) This section does not apply to a district, county, or precinct officer if the county treasurer or county auditor is required to collect the fee or commission under Section 154.011.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 217, Sec. 6, eff. May 23, 1995.

Sec. 154.010. AUTHORITY TO PURCHASE LIABILITY INSURANCE FOR COUNTY OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES. (a) A warrant may be drawn on either the general fund or salary fund to pay any insurance premium or self-insurance pool contribution for the purpose of providing insurance or other coverage for the liabilities of an official or employee of the county, a district attorney who has all or part of the county within the district attorney's jurisdiction, or an official of any special purpose district located, in whole or in part, in the county arising from the performance of an official duty or a duty of employment as authorized by Section 157.041 or Chapter 119 or by Chapter 791 or 2259, Government Code.

(b) Subdivision (a) is applicable regardless of whether the commissioners court adopts an order in accordance with Section 154.007, Local Government Code.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 351, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 561, Sec. 6, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 8.286, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 154.011. COLLECTIONS BY COUNTY TREASURER OR COUNTY AUDITOR. (a) If a district, county, or precinct officer consents, the commissioners court of a county with a population of 2.8 million or more may designate the county treasurer, if the county treasurer consents, or the county auditor, if the county auditor consents, to collect a fee, commission, judgment, fine, forfeiture, or penalty on behalf of the district, county, or precinct officer who is required by law to collect the fee, commission, judgment, fine, forfeiture, or penalty.

(b) The official designated shall report the collection of a fee, commission, judgment, fine, forfeiture, or penalty to the district, county, or precinct officer.

(c) The official designated is solely liable for collecting the fee, commission, judgment, fine, forfeiture, or penalty.

(d) The official designated may discharge liability under this section in the same manner provided for a district, county, or precinct officer.

(e) In this section, "county treasurer" includes a person performing the duties of the county treasurer and "county auditor" includes a person performing the duties of the county auditor.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 217, Sec. 7, eff. May 23, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER B. PROVISIONS APPLICABLE IN COUNTY WITH POPULATION OF 190,000 OR LESS

Sec. 154.021. COUNTIES COVERED BY SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter applies to a county with a population of 190,000 or less, except as otherwise provided by this subchapter.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 154.022. OPTION TO PAY COMPENSATION ON FEE BASIS OR SALARY BASIS IN COUNTY WITH POPULATION OF LESS THAN 20,000. (a) In a county with a population of less than 20,000, the commissioners court shall determine, by order entered in the record at its first regular meeting in the first month of each fiscal year, whether county officers are to be compensated for the fiscal year by an annual salary or by fees earned from the performance of official duties. This subsection does not apply to a county surveyor, registrar of vital statistics, or notary public or to a county officer required to be compensated on a salary basis.

(b) Before the expiration of the first month of the fiscal year, the county clerk shall deliver to the comptroller of public accounts a certified copy of the commissioners court's order.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 154.023. SALARY FUND. (a) A salary fund shall be created in the county to be known as the "officers' salary fund of __________ County, Texas." The following items shall be paid from the fund:

(1) salaries of district, county, and precinct officers;

(2) salaries of the officers' deputies, assistants, and clerks; and

(3) the authorized expenses of the offices of those officers.

(b) The salary fund shall be:

(1) deposited in the county depository;

(2) kept separate from other county funds; and

(3) protected to the same extent as other county funds.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 154.0235. PROCEDURES REGARDING PAYMENT OF OFFICE EXPENSES AND EMPLOYEE SALARIES. (a) A district, county, or precinct officer may issue a warrant against the salary fund to pay authorized expenses of the office or the salary of an employee whose salary may be paid from the fund.

(b) A payment may not be made from the salary fund to an employee for a service performed before the person has taken the constitutional oath of office, if applicable, and the person's authorized appointment and oath, if any, have been filed for record with the county clerk and the county auditor, if the county has a county auditor.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 330 (S.B. 354), Sec. 2, eff. May 31, 2019.

Sec. 154.024. MONTHLY REPORT OF EXPENSES OF OFFICERS. At the end of each month, an officer who is compensated on a salary basis shall prepare a report of the officer's expenses. The report must:

(1) contain an itemized and sworn statement of all approved expenses incurred by the officer and charged to the officer's county;

(2) contain the name of the case, if any, in connection with which an expense is incurred; and

(3) be accompanied by invoices covering any purchases and requisitions issued by the officer and included in the report.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 154.025. DISBURSEMENTS TO PERSONS WITH OUTSTANDING DEBT PROHIBITED. (a) In this section, "debt" includes delinquent taxes, fines, fees, and indebtedness arising from written agreements with the county. The term includes delinquent property taxes whether reduced to judgment or not.

(b) If notice of indebtedness has been filed with the county auditor and county treasurer evidencing the indebtedness of a person to the state, the county, or a salary fund, a warrant may not be drawn on a county fund in favor of a person, or an agent or assignee of a person, until:

(1) the county treasurer, or the county auditor in a county without a county treasurer, notifies in writing the person owing the debt that the debt is outstanding; and

(2) the debt is paid.

(c) A county may apply any funds the county owes a person to the outstanding balance of debt for which notice is made under Subsection (b)(1), if the notice includes a statement that the amount owed by the county to the person may be applied to reduce the outstanding debt.

(d) A county may include a notice in its forms, bonds, or other agreements stating that the county may offset payments to a person in accordance with this section.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 54, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 139, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 120 (S.B. 1106), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 414 (S.B. 382), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 154.026. TRANSFER OF SALARY FUND SURPLUS TO GENERAL FUND. After the end of a fiscal year, the commissioners court by order may transfer to the general fund of the county any money remaining in a salary fund if all claims against the salary fund incurred for the fiscal year have been paid.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER C. PROVISIONS APPLICABLE IN COUNTY WITH POPULATION OF MORE THAN 190,000

Sec. 154.041. COUNTIES COVERED BY SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter applies to a county with a population of more than 190,000.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 154.042. SALARY FUND. (a) A salary fund shall be created in the county for each district, county, and precinct officer to be known as the "(officer's title) salary fund of (name of county) County, Texas." The purpose of the fund is to pay:

(1) the salary of the officer;

(2) the salaries of the officer's deputies, assistants, clerks, stenographers, and investigators; and

(3) authorized and approved expenses of the office of the officer.

(b) The salary fund shall be:

(1) deposited in the county depository;

(2) kept separate from other county funds; and

(3) protected to the same extent and draw the same interest as other county funds.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 154.043. PROCEDURES REGARDING PAYMENT OF EMPLOYEE SALARIES. (a) A district, county, or precinct officer may issue a warrant against the salary fund to pay the salary of an employee whose salary may be paid from the fund.

(b) A payment may not be made from the salary fund to an employee for a service performed before the person has taken the constitutional oath of office, if applicable, and the person's authorized appointment and oath, if any, have been filed for record with the county clerk and the county auditor, if the county has a county auditor.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 154.044. MONTHLY REPORT OF FEES, COMMISSIONS, AND EXPENSES OF OFFICERS. (a) On or before the fifth day of each month, a district, county, or precinct officer shall file with the county auditor a report, on a form prescribed by the county auditor, that contains:

(1) a detailed and itemized statement of all fees, commissions, and other compensation that the officer collected during the preceding month;

(2) an itemized and sworn statement of all expense claims paid during the preceding month; and

(3) the amount paid during the preceding month to each employee of the officer and the name and position of the employee.

(b) An officer who serves only part of the fiscal year shall file a report and make final settlement for the part of the fiscal year that the officer served. The officer is entitled to the part of the officer's compensation proportionate to the part of the year served.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 154.045. DISBURSEMENTS TO PERSON WITH OUTSTANDING DEBT PROHIBITED. (a) In this section, "debt" includes delinquent taxes, fines, fees, and indebtedness arising from written agreements with the county. The term includes delinquent property taxes whether reduced to judgment or not.

(b) If a notice of indebtedness has been filed with the county auditor or county treasurer evidencing the indebtedness of a person to the state, the county, or a salary fund, a warrant may not be drawn on a county fund in favor of the person, or an agent or assignee of the person, until:

(1) the county treasurer, or the county auditor in a county without a county treasurer, notifies in writing the person owing the debt that the debt is outstanding; and

(2) the debt is paid.

(c) A county may apply any funds the county owes a person to the outstanding balance of debt for which notice is made under Subsection (b)(1), if the notice includes a statement that the amount owed by the county to the person may be applied to reduce the outstanding debt.

(d) A county may include a notice in its forms, bonds, or other agreements stating that the county may offset payments to a person in accordance with this section.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1155, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 139, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 120 (S.B. 1106), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 414 (S.B. 382), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 154.046. TRANSFER OF SALARY FUND SURPLUS TO GENERAL FUND. After the end of a fiscal year, the commissioners court by order shall transfer to the general fund of the county, by warrant issued by the county clerk, any money remaining in a salary fund when all claims against the fund incurred for the fiscal year have been paid and the officer's accounts have been audited and approved by the county auditor.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.